Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 4. General Municipal Election

§ 22-23-401.
Preparation of ballots; cost.

The county clerk shall prepare ballots which shall be in substantially the same form as the general election nonpartisan ballot for the municipal general election. The name of every candidate legally qualified to appear on the ballot and all municipal ballot propositions to be voted on at the election shall be printed thereon. The cost of preparing the municipal ballots shall be determined by the county clerk and paid by the municipality.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-328; Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence, deleted “and voting machine ballot labels.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

§§ 22-23-402 and 22-23-403.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, provided for rotation of names on a ballot and canvassing of returns and certification of results.

§ 22-23-404.
Commencement of term of office.

Except as otherwise provided by W.S.

22-23-202

, the term of office of a person elected at the municipal general election commences on the first Monday in January following the general election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-333; Laws 2001, ch. 116, § 1.

Applied

in

Committee to Restore Mayor-Council Form of Gov't v. City of Rawlins, 692 P.2d 944,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 353

(Wyo. 1984).

§ 22-23-405.
Constitutional oath required.

Before entering his duties, a person elected to a municipal office shall sign and file with the city clerk the same constitutional oath of office as county officers.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-334.

Cross references. —

For oath of office, see art. 6, § 20, Wyo. Const.